Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.440

Public posting of enforcement actions restricted—Substance use disorder monitoring stipend program.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) The department or *commission may not post information regarding an enforcement action taken by the *commission against a person licensed under this chapter, including any supporting documents or indication that the enforcement action was taken, on any public website when the following conditions are met:

(a) In connection with the enforcement action, the person has been required by an order or agreement with the *commission to contact a *commission-approved substance use disorder monitoring program authorized by RCW 18.130.175, and if recommended by the program, to contract with and participate in the program;

(b) The *commission has found that the person has substantially complied with the terms of the order or agreement; and

(c) If the website is a third-party website, the department or *commission has the ability to prevent information regarding the enforcement action from being posted on the public website.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the *commission shall establish a stipend program to defray the out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with participation in the *commission's approved substance use disorder monitoring program authorized by RCW 18.130.175.

(3) To be eligible for the stipend program, a person must:

(a) Hold an active, inactive, or suspended license issued pursuant to this chapter;

(b) Submit an application on forms provided by the *commission;

(c) Be actively participating in the *commission's approved substance use disorder monitoring program or have completed the *commission's approved substance use disorder monitoring program within six months of submission of an application for the stipend program; and

(d) Have a demonstrated need for financial assistance with the expenses incurred in connection with participation in the *commission's approved substance use disorder monitoring program.

(4) A person is not eligible for the stipend program if they have previously applied for and participated in the stipend program.

(5) The *commission may defray up to 80 percent of each out-of-pocket expense deemed eligible for defrayment under this section.

(6) Out-of-pocket expenses eligible for defrayment under this section include the costs of substance use evaluation, treatment, and other ancillary services, including drug testing, participation in professional peer support groups, and any other expenses deemed appropriate by the *commission.

(7) A person participating in the stipend program established in this section shall document their out-of-pocket expenses in a manner specified by the *commission.

(8) The *commission must provide updated information on its website regarding the total number of individuals that have participated in the stipend program, the average total amount of eligible expenses defrayed for each participant, the aggregated total amount of expenses that have been defrayed for all individuals that have participated in the stipend program, and the amount of funds available for the stipend program.

(9) The *commission shall establish the stipend program no later than July 1, 2024.

(10) The *commission may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

[2023 c 141 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.